South Dakota, session 2026, SB194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-20G:
A medical cannabis dispensary licensed under this chapter may not acquire,
cultivate, deliver, dispense, distribute, possess, produce, sell, store, supply, transfer, or
transport:
(1) Cannabis flower that exceeds thirty percent tetrahydrocannabinol;
(2) A liquid concentrate cannabis product that exceeds sixty percent
tetrahydrocannabinol;
(3) An edible cannabis product that exceeds five milligrams tetrahydrocannabinol per
serving;
(4) An edible cannabis product that exceeds one hundred milligrams
tetrahydrocannabinol per container; and
(5) A cannabis oil that exceeds five percent tetrahydrocannabinol.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.